Washington statutes.
RCW 2.04.100

Vacancy, how filled.

If a vacancy occurs in the office of a justice of the supreme court, the governor shall appoint a person to hold the office until the election and qualification of a justice to fill the vacancy, which election shall take place at the next succeeding general election, and the justice so elected shall hold the office for the remainder of the unexpired term.

[ 1971 c 81 s 3; 1955 c 38 s 2. Prior: 1937 c 15 s 1; 1893 c 5 s 2; 1890 p 321 s 3; RRS s 11044.]